Louisiana, session 2026, HB1122.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:32.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§32.1. Individual income tax rate reduction; requirements and limitations
A. If monies are deposited into the Louisiana Income Tax Elimination Fund
prior to June thirtieth of any fiscal year, then no later than the September thirtieth
immediately following such deposit, the secretary of the Department of Revenue
shall perform the calculation provided in Subsection B of this Section and the
individual income tax rate provided for in R.S. 47:32 shall be reduced accordingly
for the tax year beginning the following January first.
B.(1) The individual income tax rate shall be reduced in accordance with a
calculation performed as follows:
(a) The total amount of monies transferred into the Louisiana Income Tax
Elimination Fund in the prior fiscal year shall be divided by the total amount of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2662 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1122
personal income tax revenue collected in the same fiscal year as the year in which
the monies were deposited into the Louisiana Income Tax Elimination Fund.
(b) This figure shall be multiplied by the personal income tax rate in effect
at the time the calculation is performed.
(c) The product shall be subtracted from the personal income tax rate in
effect at the time the calculation is performed.
(d) The resulting figure shall be the new personal income tax rate for the
immediately following tax year.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, if the
individual income tax rate reduction as calculated by the secretary of the Department
of Revenue would result in a reduction of five-hundredths of one percent or less,
then no rate reduction shall occur.
C. When the provisions of Subsection B of this Section require a reduction
in the individual income tax rate, the secretary of the Department of Revenue shall
publish the reduced rate on the department's website and shall include the reduced
rate when publishing the tax tables pursuant to R.S. 47:295 and the withholding
tables pursuant to R.S. 47:112.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment of Article VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act which
originated as House Bill No. 646 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is adopted
at a statewide election and becomes effective.